src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-3lex_ruonas_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config: 
  hfst: 
    Gen: ../../generator-dict-gt-norm.hfstol
    Morph: ../../analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfstol
  xerox: 
    Gen: ../../generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests: 

  Noun - ruonâs: 
    ruonâs+N+Sg+Nom: ruonâs
    ruonâs+N+Sg+Gen: ruonnâs
    ruonâs+N+Sg+Acc: ruonnâs
    ruonâs+N+Sg+Ill: ruonâsân
    ruonâs+N+Sg+Loc: ruonâsist
    ruonâs+N+Sg+Com: ruonâsáin
    ruonâs+N+Sg+Abe: ruonnâsttáá
    ruonâs+N+Ess: ruonâsin
    ruonâs+N+Par: ruonâsid
    ruonâs+N+Pl+Nom: ruonâseh
    ruonâs+N+Pl+Gen: ruonâsij
    ruonâs+N+Pl+Acc: ruonâsijd
    ruonâs+N+Pl+Ill: ruonâsáid
    ruonâs+N+Pl+Loc: ruonâsijn
    ruonâs+N+Pl+Com: [ruonâsijguin, ruonâsijgijn]
    ruonâs+N+Pl+Abe: ruonâsijttáá
